Utah statutes.
52-2-1.   Time in which to qualify -- Failure -- Office declared vacant.

(1)  When any person duly elected or appointed to any office of the state or any of its political subdivisions, fails to qualify for the office within 60 days after the date of the beginning of the term of office for which the person was elected or appointed, the office is vacant and shall be filled as provided by law.

(2)  When a required bond of any officer of the state or of any of its political subdivisions is canceled, revoked, annulled or otherwise becomes void or of no effect, without another proper required bond being given so that continuance of the required bonded protection is afforded, the office of the officer is vacant and shall be filled as provided by law.



Amended by Chapter 336, 2011 General Session

